Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF501.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2265XS (4) 91 lh/ko S.F. 501 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 249A.59 Fertility preservation. 1 1. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise 2 requires: 3 a. âASRMâ means the American society for reproductive 4 medicine or its successor organization. 5 b. âStandard fertility preservation servicesâ means 6 procedures and services consistent with established medical 7 practices or professional guidelines published by ASRM or 8 the American society of clinical oncology, or its successor 9 organization, for a person who has a medical condition or is 10 expected to undergo medication therapy, surgery, radiation, 11 chemotherapy, or other medical treatment that is recognized 12 by health care professionals to cause a risk of fertility 13 impairment. 14 2. The department shall submit any state plan amendment 15 or waiver as may be necessary to the centers for Medicare and 16 Medicaid services of the United States department of health 17 and human services to provide coverage under Medicaid for 18 standard fertility preservation services, including up to three 19 completed oocyte retrievals with unlimited embryo transfers 20 in accordance with the guidelines of the ASRM, using single 21 embryo transfer if recommended and medically appropriate. Upon 22 receipt of federal approval, the medical assistance program 23 shall immediately provide coverage for standard fertility 24 preservation services. 25 Sec. 2. HAWKI ââ FERTILITY PRESERVATION. 26 1. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise 27 requires: 28 a. âASRMâ means the American society for reproductive 29 medicine or its successor organization. 30 b. âStandard fertility preservation servicesâ means 31 procedures and services consistent with established medical 32 practices or professional guidelines published by ASRM or 33 the American society of clinical oncology or its successor 34 organization for a person who has a medical condition or is 35 -1- LSB 2265XS (4) 91 lh/ko 1/ 2 S.F. 501 expected to undergo medication therapy, surgery, radiation, 1 chemotherapy, or other medical treatment that is recognized 2 by health care professionals to cause a risk of fertility 3 impairment. 4 2. The department shall submit any Medicaid state plan 5 amendment or waiver as may be necessary to the centers for 6 Medicare and Medicaid services of the United States department 7 of health and human services to provide coverage under the 8 Hawki program for standard fertility preservation services, 9 including up to three completed oocyte retrievals with 10 unlimited embryo transfers in accordance with the guidelines 11 of the ASRM, using single embryo transfer if recommended and 12 medically appropriate. Upon receipt of federal approval, the 13 Hawki program shall immediately provide coverage for standard 14 fertility preservation services. 15